Massachusetts, session 194th, S927.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 44 the following new section:-
Section 44 1/2. Any public institution of higher education as defined in Section 5 shall
be required to collect and provide to all students, when applying for or changing their major field
of study, the following information: (i) The estimated cost in total for the selected major when
taking the required courses to complete such major; (ii) the average amount of debt students who
have completed a degree in such major in the past three years have acquired upon graduation for
the chosen major; (iii) the professions that recent graduates within the major have acquired,
within 1 year of graduation, including the number who have not received jobs and have not
of 2

continued on to higher education programs; and (iv) the average salary of recent graduates,
within 3 years, with the major.
of 2